Hawaii statutes.
[§671D-13] Guidelines of the director.
The director, in consultation with the director of the department of health,
may adopt pursuant to chapter 91, such rules and voluntary guidelines as may
assist the professional review bodies in meeting the standards described in
section 671D-11(a). [L 1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next